Mississippi statutes. Title 49. Conservation and Ecology
Lifetime Sportsman License

§ 49-7-151.
Creation of lifetime sportsman license and Mississippi Wildlife Endowment Fund.

Recognizing the inestimable importance to the state and its citizens of conserving the wildlife resources of Mississippi and recognizing the desires of many citizens who wish to make a lifetime contribution to preserve our rich legacy of wildlife resources for future generations, it is the intention of the Legislature to create a lifetime sportsman license and the Mississippi Wildlife Endowment Fund.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 545, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 1988.

§ 49-7-153.
Lifetime sportsman and lifetime fishing licenses.

Any resident may purchase a lifetime sportsman hunting and fishing license by filing an application in the office of the department. The license shall qualify the licensee to take all fish, game and fowl, except waterfowl, including deer and turkey, in the manner provided by law. The license shall also permit the licensee to hunt with primitive weapons and bow and arrow, and to fish in the public waters of the state, including the taking of crabs, oysters, shrimp and any saltwater fish authorized to be taken under a recreational license.

The department may issue a resident lifetime sportsman license at a fee to be determined by the commission at an amount not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a person thirteen (13) years of age or older and not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) for a person under thirteen (13) years of age. All lifetime licenses shall be issued from the office of the department. Each application for a lifetime license must be accompanied by a certified copy of the birth certificate of the individual to be named as the license holder, if the individual is twelve (12) years of age or under.

The commission shall establish proof of residency requirements for the purchase of a lifetime license, and shall also establish such restrictions on and regulations for lifetime licenses as it deems necessary and proper. An applicant for a resident lifetime license must have been domiciled in this state for eighteen (18) consecutive months immediately preceding the date of his application for a license. The burden of proving domicile shall be on the applicant.

The department may issue a native son or daughter nonresident lifetime sportsman hunting and fishing license. The commission shall establish the fee, but the fee shall not be less than One Thousand Five Hundred Dollars ($1,500.00). The applicant must provide a certified copy of the original birth certificate showing that the applicant was born in Mississippi and/or if the parents’ address was in Mississippi at the time of birth as shown on the birth certificate or other documents and/or official documents reflect that one of said parents was on active military service outside the State of Mississippi at the time of said birth. Further, if the birth certificate of each parent reflects that each parent was born in the State of Mississippi, then any child born outside the State of Mississippi of those parents may be issued a nonresident lifetime sportsman license for the above set out fee.

Any materially false statement contained in an application for a lifetime license renders void the license issued pursuant to that application, and subjects the applicant to criminal prosecution under Section 49-7-45.

Nothing in this section exempts an applicant for a lifetime license from meeting other qualifications or requirements otherwise established by law for the privilege of hunting or fishing.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 545, § 2; Laws, 1991, ch. 529, § 1; Laws, 1995, ch. 558, § 1; Laws, 1997, ch. 608, § 1; Laws, 2001, ch. 505, § 1, eff from and after Mar. 24, 2001.

§ 49-7-155.
Wildlife Endowment Fund.

The commission is hereby authorized to establish a fund to be known as the Wildlife Endowment Fund to be deposited in an approved state depository and expended by appropriation approved by the Legislature as provided by law. The department shall deposit all proceeds from the sale of lifetime licenses into such fund. The interest obtained from any investment or deposit of monies in such fund shall be deposited by the commission into such fund. The commission shall invest the assets of the fund as provided by law.

The assets of the Wildlife Endowment Fund shall be derived from the proceeds of the sale of lifetime licenses authorized under Sections 49-7-151 through 49-7-155. The following limitations are placed on expenditures from the fund:

No expenditure shall be made from the principal of the Wildlife Endowment Fund;

The income earned and accruing from the investment of the Wildlife Endowment Fund shall be spent only in furthering the conservation of wildlife resources and the operations of the department in accomplishing the purposes of the department.

HISTORY:
Laws, 1988, ch. 545, § 3; Laws, 1991, ch. 529, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 1991.